California statutes. Vehicle Code
(iv) The department shall suspend the privilege to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to subparagraph (A) immediately upon receipt of notification from the installer that a person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the ignition interlock device, has removed the device prior to the termination date of the restriction, or fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device ordered pursuant to this section. The privilege shall remain suspended for the remaining period of the original
 suspension imposed pursuant to subparagraph (A), except that if the person provides proof to the satisfaction of the department that the person is in compliance with the restriction issued pursuant to this section, the department may, in its discretion, restore the privilege to operate a motor vehicle and reimpose the remaining term of the restriction.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, if a person has been administratively determined to have been driving in violation of Section 23136 or to have refused chemical testing pursuant to Section 13353.1, the period of suspension shall not be for less than one year.

(c) If a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle is suspended
 pursuant to Section 13353.2 and the person is convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, including, but not limited to, a violation described in Section 23620, arising out of the same occurrence, both the suspension under Section 13353.2 and the suspension or revocation under Section 13352 shall be imposed, except that the periods of suspension or revocation shall run concurrently, and the total period of suspension or revocation shall not exceed the longer of the two suspension or revocation periods.

(d) For the purposes of this section, a conviction of an offense in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or Canada that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, is a conviction of that particular
 section of the Vehicle Code or Penal Code.

(e) The holder of a commercial driver’s license who was operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, at the time of a violation that resulted in a suspension or revocation of the person’s noncommercial driving privilege is not eligible for the restricted driver’s license authorized pursuant to this section.

(f) This section shall become operative January 1, 2033.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 8.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.4.

(a) Except as provided in Section 13353.3, 13353.6, 13353.7, or 13353.8, the driving privilege shall not be restored, and a restricted or hardship permit to operate a motor vehicle shall not be issued, to a person during the suspension or revocation period specified in Section 13353, 13353.1, or 13353.3.

(b) The privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall not be restored after a suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 13352, 13353, 13353.1, or 13353.2 until all applicable fees, including the fees prescribed in Section 14905, have been paid and the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430, to the department.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2019.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 9.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 10 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.4.

(a) Except as provided in Section 13353.3, 13353.7, or 13353.8, the driving privilege shall not be restored, and a restricted or hardship permit to operate a motor vehicle shall not be issued, to a person during the suspension or revocation period specified in Section 13353, 13353.1, or 13353.3.

(b) The privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall not be restored after a suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 13352, 13353, 13353.1, or 13353.2 until all applicable fees, including the fees prescribed in Section 14905, have been paid and the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430, to the department.

(c) This section shall become operative January 1,
 2033.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 15) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 10.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.45.

The department shall, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, with representatives of the county alcohol program administrators, and with representatives of licensed drinking driver program providers, develop a certificate of completion for the purposes of Sections 13352, 13352.4, and 13352.5 and shall develop, implement, and maintain a system for safeguarding the certificates against misuse. The department may charge a reasonable fee for each blank completion certificate distributed to a drinking driver program. The fee shall be sufficient to cover, but shall not exceed, the costs incurred in administering this section, Sections 13352, 13352.4, and 13352.5 or twelve dollars ($12) per person, whichever is
 less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 86.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.5.

(a) If a person whose driving privilege is suspended or revoked under Section 13352, Section 13352.1, former Section 13352.4, Section 13352.4, Section 13352.6, paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 23247, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 13352 is a resident of another state at the time the mandatory period of suspension or revocation expires, the department may terminate the suspension or revocation, upon written application of the person, for the purpose of allowing the person to apply for a license in the person’s state of residence. The application shall include, but need not be limited to, evidence
 satisfactory to the department that the applicant now resides in another state.

(b) If the person submits an application for a California driver’s license within three years after the date of the action to terminate suspension or revocation pursuant to subdivision (a), a license shall not be issued until evidence satisfactory to the department establishes that the person is qualified for reinstatement and no grounds exist including, but not limited to, one or more subsequent convictions for driving under the influence of alcohol or other drugs that would support a refusal to issue a license. The department may waive the three-year requirement if the person provides the department with proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430, and proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program described in Section 13352, and the driving-under-the-influence program is of the length
 required under paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 13352.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “state” includes a foreign province or country.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2033, deletes or
 extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 11.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 12 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.5.

(a) If a person whose driving privilege is suspended or revoked under Section 13352, Section 13352.1, former Section 13352.4, Section 13352.4, Section 13352.6, paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 23247, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 23575 is a resident of another state at the time the mandatory period of suspension or revocation expires, the department may terminate the suspension or revocation, upon written application of the person, for the purpose of allowing the person to apply for a license in the person’s state of residence. The application shall include, but need not be limited to, evidence
 satisfactory to the department that the applicant now resides in another state.

(b) If the person submits an application for a California driver’s license within three years after the date of the action to terminate suspension or revocation pursuant to subdivision (a), a license shall not be issued until evidence satisfactory to the department establishes that the person is qualified for reinstatement and no grounds exist including, but not limited to, one or more subsequent convictions for driving under the influence of alcohol or other drugs that would support a refusal to issue a license. The department may waive the three-year requirement if the person provides the department with proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430, and proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program described in Section 13352, and the driving-under-the-influence program is of the length
 required under paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 13352.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “state” includes a foreign province or country.

(d) This section shall become operative January 1,
 2033.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 12.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person whose driving privilege has been suspended under Section 13353.2 and who has not been convicted of, or found to have committed, a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, and if the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle has not been suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.2 for an offense that occurred on a separate occasion within 10 years of the occasion in question, may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license on or after the effective date specified in Section 13353.3, if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) The person satisfactorily provides proof of enrollment in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed under Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538.

(B) The program shall report any failure to participate in the program to the department and shall certify successful completion of the program to the department.

(C) If a person who has been issued a restricted license under this section fails at any time to participate in the program, the department shall immediately terminate the restriction and reinstate the suspension of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle. The department shall give notice of the suspension under this paragraph in the same manner as prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 13353.2 for the period specified in Section 13353.3, that is effective upon receipt by the person.

(D) For the purposes of this section, enrollment, participation, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit may not be given to a program activity completed prior to the date of the current violation.

(2) The person installs a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person operates and submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(3) The person agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (f).

(4) (A) The person was 21 years of age or older at the time the offense occurred and gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(B) If the driving privilege is restricted under this section, proof of financial responsibility, as described in Section 16430, shall be maintained for three years. If the person does not maintain that proof of financial responsibility at any time during the restriction, the driving privilege shall be suspended until the proof required pursuant to Section 16484 is received by the department.

(5) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees.

(b) The restriction under this section shall remain in effect for the remaining period of the original suspension period under
 Section 13353.3.

(c) The department shall terminate the restriction issued pursuant to this section and shall immediately reinstate the suspension of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle upon receipt of notification from the ignition interlock device installer that a person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the ignition interlock device, has removed the device prior to the termination date of the restriction, or fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device. The privilege shall remain suspended for the remaining mandatory suspension period imposed pursuant to Section 13353.3, provided, however, that if the person provides proof to the satisfaction of the department that the person is in compliance with the restriction issued pursuant to this section, the department may, in its discretion, restore the privilege to operate a motor vehicle and reimpose
 the remaining term of the restriction.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a person whose driving privilege has been suspended under Section 13353.2, who is eligible for a restricted driver’s license as provided for in this section, and who installs a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section, shall receive credit towards the mandatory term the person is required to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to Section 23575.3 for a conviction of a violation arising out of the same occurrence that led to the person’s driving privilege being suspended pursuant to Section 13352 equal to the period of time the person installs a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section or Section 13353.75.

(e) (1) The holder of a commercial driver’s license who was operating a motor vehicle
 other than a commercial vehicle, or a driver who was operating a commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, at the time of the violation that resulted in the suspension of that person’s driving privilege pursuant to Section 13353.2 is not eligible for the restricted driver’s license authorized under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), as authorized under this section, the department shall issue the person a noncommercial driver’s license restricted in the same manner and subject to the same conditions and requirements as specified in subdivision (a).

(f) A person whose driving privilege is restricted by the department pursuant to this section shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate the device and monitor the
 operation of the device. The installer shall notify the department if the device is removed or indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Bypass” means either of the following:

(A) Failure to take any random retest.

(B) Failure to pass a random retest with a breath alcohol concentration not exceeding 0.03 percent, by weight of alcohol, in the person’s blood.

(2) “Operates” includes operating a vehicle that is not owned by the person
 subject to this section.

(3) “Owned” means solely owned or owned in conjunction with another person or legal entity.

(4) “Random retest” means a breath test performed by the driver upon a certified ignition interlock device at random intervals after the initial engine startup breath test and while the vehicle’s motor is running.

(5) “Vehicle” does not include a motorcycle until the state certifies an ignition interlock device that can be installed on a motorcycle. A person subject to an ignition interlock device restriction shall not operate a motorcycle for the duration of the ignition interlock device restriction period.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), and upon a conviction under Section 23152 or 23153 for the current offense, the
 department shall suspend or revoke the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle under Section 13352 or 13352.1.

(i) The restriction conditions specified in this section shall apply only to a person who is suspended under Section 13353.2 for a violation that occurred on or after January 1, 2019.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1,
 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 13.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.7.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the person whose driving privilege has been suspended under Section 13353.2 has not been convicted of, or found to have committed, a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153 of this code, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, and if the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle has not been suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.2 for an offense that occurred on a separate occasion within 10 years of the occasion in question and, if the person subsequently enrolls in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed under Section 11836 of the Health and
 Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538, that person, if 21 years of age or older at the time the offense occurred, may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license limited to travel to and from the activities required by the program and to and from and in the course of the person’s employment. After receiving proof of enrollment in the program, and if the person has not been arrested subsequent to the offense for which the person’s driving privilege has been suspended under Section 13353.2 for a violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153 of this code, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, and if the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle has not been suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.2 for an offense that occurred on a separate occasion, notwithstanding
 Section 13551, the department shall, after review pursuant to Section 13557, suspend the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle for 30 days and then issue the person a restricted driver’s license under the following conditions:

(1) The program shall report any failure to participate in the program to the department and shall certify successful completion of the program to the department.

(2) The person was 21 years of age or older at the time the offense occurred and gives proof of financial responsibility as defined in Section 16430.

(3) The restriction shall be imposed for a period of five months.

(4) If a person who has been issued a restricted license
 under this section fails at any time to participate in the program, the department shall suspend the restricted license immediately. The department shall give notice of the suspension under this paragraph in the same manner as prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 13353.2 for the period specified in Section 13353.3, that is effective upon receipt by the person.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and upon a conviction of Section 23152 or 23153, the department shall suspend or revoke the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle under Section 13352.

(c) If the driver was operating a commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, at the time of the violation that resulted in the suspension of that person’s driving privilege under Section 13353.2, the department
 shall, pursuant to this section, if the person is otherwise eligible, issue the person a class C or class M driver’s license restricted in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as specified in subdivision (a), except that the license may not allow travel to and from or in the course of the person’s employment.

(d) If the holder of a commercial driver’s license was operating a motor vehicle, other than a commercial vehicle as defined in Section 15210, at the time of the violation that resulted in the suspension of that person’s driving privilege pursuant to Section 13353.2, the department shall, pursuant to this section, if the person is otherwise eligible, issue the person a class C or class M driver’s license restricted in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as specified in subdivision (a).

 (e) This section does not apply to a person whose driving privilege has been suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.2 for an offense that occurred on a separate occasion, or as a result of a conviction of a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, when that violation occurred within 10 years of the offense in question. This subdivision shall be operative only so long as a one-year suspension of the driving privilege for a second or subsequent occurrence or offense, with no restricted or hardship licenses permitted, is required by Section 408 or 410 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 670, Sec. 5.   (AB 2188)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.75.

(a) Subject to subdivision (d), a person whose driving privilege has been suspended under Section 13353.2, and who has been previously convicted of, or found to have committed, a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, or whose privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.2 for an offense that occurred on a separate occasion within 10 years of the occasion in question may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license on or after the effective date specified in Section 13353.3, if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) The person satisfactorily provides proof of enrollment in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed under Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code.

(B) The program shall report any failure to participate in the program to the department and shall certify successful completion of the program to the department.

(C) If a person who has been issued a restricted license under this section fails at any time to participate in the program, the department shall immediately terminate the restriction and reinstate the suspension of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle. The department shall give notice of the suspension under this paragraph in the same manner as prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 13353.2 for the period specified in Section 13353.3, that is effective upon receipt by the
 person.

(D) For the purposes of this section, enrollment, participation, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit may not be given to a program activity completed prior to the date of the current violation.

(2) (A) The person was 21 years of age or older at the time the offense occurred and gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(B) If the driving privilege is restricted under this section, proof of financial responsibility, as described in Section 16430, shall be maintained for three years. If the person does not maintain that proof of financial responsibility at any time during the restriction, the driving privilege shall be suspended until the proof required pursuant to Section 16484 is received by
 the department.

(3) The person installs a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that
 the person operates and submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(4) The person agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (g).

(5) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees.

(b) The restriction shall remain in effect for the remaining period of the original suspension period under Section 13353.3.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), and upon a conviction under Section 23152 or 23153 for the current offense, the department shall suspend or revoke the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle under Section 13352 or 13352.1.

(d) (1) The holder of a commercial driver’s license who was operating a motor vehicle other than a commercial vehicle, or a driver who was operating a commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, at the time of the violation that resulted in the suspension of that person’s driving privilege pursuant to Section 13353.2 is not eligible for the restricted driver’s license authorized under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), as authorized under this section, the department shall issue the person a noncommercial driver’s license restricted in the same manner and subject to the same conditions and requirements as specified in subdivision (a).

(e) The department shall terminate the restriction issued pursuant to this section and shall immediately reinstate the suspension of the privilege
 to operate a motor vehicle upon receipt of notification from the ignition interlock device installer that a person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the ignition interlock device, has removed the device prior to the termination date of the restriction, or fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device. The privilege shall remain suspended for the remaining mandatory suspension period imposed pursuant to Section 13353.3. However, if the person provides proof to the satisfaction of the department that the person is in compliance with the restriction issued pursuant to this section, the department may, in its discretion, restore the privilege to operate a motor vehicle and reimpose the remaining term of the restriction.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a person whose driving privilege has been suspended under Section 13353.2, who is eligible for a
 restricted driver’s license as provided for in this section, and who installs a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section, shall receive credit toward the mandatory term the person is required to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to Section 23575.3 for a conviction of a violation arising out of the same occurrence that led to the person’s driving privilege being suspended pursuant to Section 13352 or 13352.1 equal to the period of time the person installs a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section or Section 13353.75.

(g) A person whose driving privilege is restricted by the department pursuant to this section shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate the device and monitor the operation of the device.
 The installer shall notify the department if the device is removed or indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Bypass” means either of the following:

(A) Failure to take any random retest.

(B) Failure to pass a random retest with a breath alcohol concentration not exceeding 0.03 percent, by weight of alcohol, in the person’s blood.

(2) “Operates” includes operating a vehicle that is not owned by the person subject to this
 section.

(3) “Owned” means solely owned or owned in conjunction with another person or legal entity.

(4) “Random retest” means a breath test performed by the driver upon a certified ignition interlock device at random intervals after the initial engine startup breath test and while the vehicle’s motor is running.

(5) “Vehicle” does not include a motorcycle until the state certifies an ignition interlock device that can be installed on a motorcycle. A person subject to an ignition interlock device restriction shall not operate a motorcycle for the duration of the ignition interlock device restriction period.

(i) The restriction conditions specified in this section shall apply only to a person who is suspended under Section 13353.2 for a violation that
 occurred on or after January 1, 2019.

(j) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1,
 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 14.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.8.

(a) After the department has issued an order suspending or delaying driving privileges as a result of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 23136, the department, upon the petition of the person affected, may review the order and may impose restrictions on the person’s privilege to drive based upon a showing of a critical need to drive, if the department determines that, within 10 years of the current violation of Section 23136, the person has not violated Section 23136 or been convicted of a separate violation of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or of Section 23103, with a plea of guilty under Section 23103.5, or of Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal Code, and that the person’s driving privilege has not been suspended or revoked under Section 13353, 13353.1, or 13353.2 within that 10-year period.

(b) For purposes of this section, a conviction of an offense in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the Dominion of Canada that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, 23153, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, is a conviction of that particular section of the Vehicle Code or Penal Code.

(c) As used in this section, “critical need to drive” means the circumstances that are required to be shown for the issuance of a junior permit pursuant to Section 12513.

(d) The restriction shall be imposed not earlier than the 31st day after the date the order of suspension became effective and shall remain in effect for the balance of the period of suspension or restriction in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13355.

The department shall immediately suspend the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of any court showing that the person has been convicted of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 22348, or upon a receipt of a report of a judge of a juvenile court, a juvenile hearing officer, or a referee of a juvenile court showing that the person has been found to have committed a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 22348 under the following conditions and for the periods, as follows:

(a) Upon a conviction or finding of an offense under subdivision (b) of Section 22348 that occurred within three years of a prior offense resulting in a conviction of an offense under subdivision (b) of Section 22348, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of six months, or the privilege shall be restricted for six months to necessary travel to and from the person’s place of employment and, if driving a motor vehicle is necessary to perform the duties of the person’s employment, restricted to driving within the person’s scope of employment.

(b) Upon a conviction or finding of an offense under subdivision (b) of Section 22348 that occurred within five years of two or more prior offenses resulting in convictions of offenses under subdivision (b) of Section 22348, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of one year, or the privilege shall be restricted for one year to necessary travel to and from the person’s place of employment and, if driving a motor vehicle is necessary to perform the duties of the person’s employment, restricted to driving within the person’s scope of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13357.

Upon the recommendation of the court the department shall suspend or revoke the privilege to operate a motor vehicle of any person who has been found guilty of a violation of Section 10851.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

13359.

The department may suspend or revoke the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle upon any of the grounds which authorize the refusal to issue a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

13360.

Upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the restrictions of a driver’s license, the department may suspend or revoke the same.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13361.

The department may suspend the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of any court showing that the person has been convicted of any of the following crimes or offenses:

(a) Failure to stop in the event of an accident resulting in damage to property only, or otherwise failing to comply with the requirements of Section 20002. 

(b) A second or subsequent conviction of reckless driving.

(c) Manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code.

In any case under this section the department is authorized to require proof of ability to respond in damages as defined in Section 16430.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.   Effective February 21, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

13362.

The department may require the surrender to it of any driver’s license which has been issued erroneously or which contains any erroneous or false statement, or which does not contain any notation required by law or by the department. In the event a licensee does not surrender the license upon proper demand, the department may suspend the licensee’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle. The suspension shall continue until the correction of the license by the department or until issuance of another license or temporary license in lieu thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13363.

(a) The department may, in its discretion, except as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 6, of this code, suspend or revoke the privilege of any resident or nonresident to drive a motor vehicle in this State upon receiving notice of the conviction of the person in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the Dominion of Canada of an offense therein which, if committed in this State, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle.

(b) Whenever any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the Dominion of Canada reports the conviction of a violation in such place by a person licensed in this State, the department shall not give effect to such report pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section or Section 15023 unless the department is satisfied that the law of such other place pertaining to the conviction is substantially the same as the law of this State pertaining to such conviction and that the description of the violation from which the conviction arose, is sufficient and that the interpretation and enforcement of such law are substantially the same in such other place as they are in this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

13364.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended upon notification by a bank or financial institution that a check has been dishonored when that check was presented to the department for either of the following reasons:

(1) In payment of a fine that resulted from an outstanding violation pursuant to Section 40508 or a suspension pursuant to Section 13365.

(2) In payment of a fee or penalty owed by the person, if the fee or penalty is required by this code for the issuance, reissuance, or return of the person’s
 driver’s license after suspension, revocation, or restriction of the driving privilege.

(b) The suspension shall remain in effect until payment of all fines, fees, and penalties is made to the department or to the court, as appropriate, and the person’s driving record does not contain any notification of a court order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42003 or of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 40508.

(c) No suspension imposed pursuant to this section shall become effective until 30 days after the mailing of a written notice of the intent to suspend.

(d) The written notice of a suspension imposed pursuant to this section shall be delivered by certified mail.
